Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.500.010

Local effort assistance funding—Purpose—Not basic education.

The legislature intends to continue providing local effort assistance funding to school districts. Local effort assistance provides schools in property-poor districts with funding for locally determined activities that enrich the state's program of basic education, thereby enhancing equity in students' access to extracurricular activities and similar enrichments. The purpose of these funds is to mitigate the effect that above average property tax rates might have on the ability of a school district to raise local revenues to supplement the state's basic program of education. These funds serve to equalize the property tax rates that individual taxpayers would pay for such levies and to provide tax relief to taxpayers in high tax rate school districts.

Local effort assistance funding is not part of the state's statutory program of basic education, nor are allocations for it part of the district's basic education allocation. Beginning September 1, 2019, and subject to RCW 28A.150.276, districts may use local effort assistance funding only to enrich the state's statutory program of basic education.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 13 s 205; 1999 c 317 s 1; 1997 c 259 s 4; 1993 c 410 s 1; (1993 c 465 s 2 expired December 31, 1995); 1992 c 49 s 2; 1987 1st ex.s. c 2 s 102. Formerly RCW 28A.41.155.]

NOTES:

Intent—2017 3rd sp.s. c 13: See note following RCW 28A.150.410.

Funding not related to basic education—1997 c 259: See note following RCW 84.52.0531.

Expiration date—1993 c 465 s 2: "Section 2 of this act shall expire December 31, 1995." [ 1993 c 465 s 3.]

Intent—Severability—Effective date—1987 1st ex.s. c 2: See notes following RCW 84.52.0531.